testing/myv-tests-noun.yaml
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакастонсеванть
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакастонсевтементь
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакастонсевтементь
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакастонсешканть
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакастонсешканть
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакастонсексэнть
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакастонсексэнть
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакастонсетне
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакастонсетне
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакастонсетнень
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакастонсетнень
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакастонсетненень
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакастонсетненень
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакастонсетнеде
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакастонсетнеде
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакастонсетнесэ
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакастонсетнесэ
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакастонсетнестэ
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакастонсетнестэ
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакастонсетнес
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакастонсетнес
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакастонсетнева
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакастонсетнева
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакастонсетнекс
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакастонсетнекс
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакастонсетнев
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакастонсетнев
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакастонсетневтеме
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакастонсетневтеме
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакастонсетнешка
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакастонсетнешка
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакастонсетненек
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакастонсетненек
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакаванкседе
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакаванкседе
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакаванксекс
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакаванксекс
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакаванксесь
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакаванксесь
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакаванксенть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакаванксенть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакаванксентень
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакаванксентень
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакаванкседенть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакаванкседенть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакаванксесэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакаванксесэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакаванксестэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакаванксестэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакаванксеванть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакаванксеванть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакаванксевтементь
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакаванксевтементь
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакаванксешканть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакаванксешканть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакаванксексэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакаванксексэнть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакаванксетне
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакаванксетне
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакаванксетнень
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакаванксетнень
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакаванксетненень
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакаванксетненень
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакаванксетнеде
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакаванксетнеде
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакаванксетнесэ
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакаванксетнесэ
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакаванксетнестэ
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакаванксетнестэ
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакаванксетнес
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакаванксетнес
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакаванксетнева
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакаванксетнева
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакаванксетнекс
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакаванксетнекс
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакаванксетнев
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакаванксетнев
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакаванксетневтеме
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакаванксетневтеме
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакаванксетнешка
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакаванксетнешка
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакаванксетненек
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакаванксетненек
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакатседе
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакатседе
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакатсекс
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакатсекс
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакатсесь
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакатсесь
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакатсенть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакатсенть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакатсентень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакатсентень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакатседенть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакатседенть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакатсесэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакатсесэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакатсестэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакатсестэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакатсеванть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакатсеванть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакатсевтементь
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакатсевтементь
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакатсевтомонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакатсевтомонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакатсексэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакатсексэнть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакатсетне
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакатсетне
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакатсетнень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакатсетнень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакатсетненень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакатсетненень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакатсетнеде
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакатсетнеде
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакатсетнесэ
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакатсетнесэ
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакатсетнестэ
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакатсетнестэ
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакатсетнес
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакатсетнес
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакатсетнева
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакатсетнева
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакатсетнекс
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакатсетнекс
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакатсетнев
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакатсетнев
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакатсетневтеме
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакатсетневтеме
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакатсетнешка
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакатсетнешка
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакатсетненек
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакатсетненек
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакавтомотседе
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакавтомотседе
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакавтомотсекс
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакавтомотсекс
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсесь
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсесь
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсенть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсенть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсентень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсентень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакавтомотседенть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакавтомотседенть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсесэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсесэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсестэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсестэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсеванть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсеванть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсевтементь
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсевтементь
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсевтомонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсевтомонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсексэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакавтомотсексэнть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакавтомотсетне
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакавтомотсетне
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакавтомотсетнень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакавтомотсетнень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакавтомотсетненень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакавтомотсетненень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакавтомотсетнеде
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакавтомотсетнеде
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакавтомотсетнесэ
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакавтомотсетнесэ
